test/src/morphology/N-psaka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - псака: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm including MWN
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: псака
    псака+N+SP+Gen+Indef: псакань
    псака+N+SP+Abl+Indef: псакадо
    псака+N+SP+DatCx+Indef: псаканень
    псака+N+SP+Com+Indef: псаканек
    псака+N+SP+Abe+Indef: псакавтомо
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+Indef: псакашка
    псака+N+SP+Ine+Indef: псакасо
    псака+N+SP+Ela+Indef: псакасто
    псака+N+SP+Ill+Indef: псакас
    псака+N+SP+Prl+Indef: псакава
    псака+N+SP+Tra+Indef: псакакс
# This does not exist    псака+N+SP+Lat+Indef: псакав
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: псакам
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: псакан
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [псакам, псакан]
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: псакан
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: псакадон
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: псакавтомон
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg1: псакашкан
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: псакасон
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: псакастон
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: псаказон
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: псакаван
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxSg1: псакаксон
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: псакат
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: псакат
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: псакат
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: псакат
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: псакадот
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: псакавтомот
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg2: псакашкат
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: псакасот
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: псакастот
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: псаказот
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: псакават
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxSg2: псакаксот
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: псаказо
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: псаканзо
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: псаканзо
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: псаканзо
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: псакадонзо
    псака+N+SP+DatCx+PxSg3: псаканстэнь
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: псакавтомонзо
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg3: псакашканзо
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: псакасонзо
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: псакастонзо
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: псаказонзо
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: псакаванзо
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxSg3: псакаксонзо
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: псаканок
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: псаканок
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: псаканок
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: псаканок
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: псакадонок
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: псакавтомонок
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl1: псакашканок
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: псакасонок
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: псакастонок
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: псаказонок
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: псакаванок
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxPl1: псакаксонок
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: псаканк
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: псаканк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: псаканк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: псаканк
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: псакадонк
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: псакавтомонк
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl2: псакашканк
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: псакасонк
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: псакастонк
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: псаказонк
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: псакаванк
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxPl2: псакаксонк
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: псакаст
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: псакаст
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: псакаст
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: псакаст
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: псакадост
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: псакавтомост
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl3: псакашкаст
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: псакасост
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: псакастост
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: псаказост
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: псакаваст
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxPl3: псакаксост
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: псакат
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: псакан
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: псаканзо
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакась
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псаканть
    псака+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакантень
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакадонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакасонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакастонть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакаванть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакавтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+CompCx+Def: псакашканть
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакаксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакатне
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакатнень
    псака+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакатненень
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакатнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакатнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакатнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакатнес
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакатнева
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакатнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакатневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+CompCx+Def: псакатнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакатненек
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакаяк
    псака+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/Гак: псаканьгак
    псака+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакадояк
    псака+N+SP+DatCx+Indef+Foc/Гак: псаканеньгак
    псака+N+SP+Com+Indef+Foc/Гак: псаканеккак
    псака+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакавтомояк
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакашкаяк
    псака+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакасояк
    псака+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакастояк
    псака+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакаскак
    псака+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакаваяк
    псака+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакакскак
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакамгак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакангак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: [псакамгак, псакангак]
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакангак
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакадонгак
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакавтомонгак
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакашкангак
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакасонгак
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакастонгак
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псаказонгак
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакавангак
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакаксонгак
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакаткак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакаткак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакаткак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакаткак
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакадоткак
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакавтомоткак
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакашкаткак
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакасоткак
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакастоткак
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псаказоткак
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакаваткак
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: псакаксоткак
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псаказояк
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псаканзояк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псаканзояк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псаканзояк
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псакадонзояк
    псака+N+SP+DatCx+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псаканстэньгак
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псакавтомонзояк
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псакашканзояк
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псакасонзояк
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псакастонзояк
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псаказонзояк
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псакаванзояк
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псакаксонзояк
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псаканоккак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псаканоккак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псаканоккак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псаканоккак
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псакадоноккак
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псакавтомоноккак
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псакашканоккак
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псакасоноккак
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псакастоноккак
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псаказоноккак
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псакаваноккак
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: псакаксоноккак
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псаканккак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псаканккак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псаканккак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псаканккак
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псакадонккак
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псакавтомонккак
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псакашканккак
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псакасонккак
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псакастонккак
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псаказонккак
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псакаванккак
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: псакаксонккак
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакасткак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакасткак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакасткак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакасткак
    псака+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакадосткак
    псака+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакавтомосткак
    псака+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакашкасткак
    псака+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакасосткак
    псака+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакастосткак
    псака+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псаказосткак
    псака+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакавасткак
    псака+N+SP+Tra+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: псакаксосткак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/Гак: псакаткак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: псакангак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: псаканзояк
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/Гак: псакаськак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/Гак: псакантькак
    псака+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Foc/Гак: псакантеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Foc/Гак: псакадонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Foc/Гак: псакасонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Foc/Гак: псакастонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Foc/Гак: псакавантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Foc/Гак: псакавтомонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+CompCx+Def+Foc/Гак: псакашкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Foc/Гак: псакаксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+CompCx+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Com+Def+Foc/Гак: псакатненеккак
